Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF717.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [144.066] GOVERNMENT MANDATES PROHIBITED: RECOVERY FROM INFECTION AS PROOF OF IMMUNIZATION. new text end new text begin (a) To ensure the sovereignty of states' rights guaranteed by the Tenth Amendment to the United States Constitution and to protect the fundamental individual liberties and privacies of all persons against an abusive federal government, no government entity or its subdivisions, agents, designees, or assigns shall have the authority to enforce or attempt to enforce any mandatory vaccines, vaccine passports, vaccine passes, or vaccine credentials in this state, whether by federal act, law, executive order, administrative order, court order, rule, regulation, statute, or ordinance. new text end new text begin (b) If any employer conducting business in Minnesota or employing any Minnesota resident chooses to require vaccinations against any infection, the employer must allow proof of presence of natural antibodies as an alternative to the vaccine. For the purposes of this section, "employer" has the meaning given under section 177.23, subdivision 6. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end